Maryland, session 2025, SB0584.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Courts and Judicial Proceedings
[11–108.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.
(2) (i) “Noneconomic damages” means:
1. In an action for personal injury, pain, suffering,
inconvenience, physical impairment, disfigurement, loss of consortium, or other
nonpecuniary injury; and
2. In an action for wrongful death, mental anguish,
emotional pain and suffering, loss of society, companionship, comfort, protection, care,
marital care, parental care, filial care, attention, advice, counsel, training, guidance, or
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0584*

SENATE BILL 584
education, or other noneconomic damages authorized under Title 3, Subtitle 9 of this
article.
(ii) “Noneconomic damages” does not include punitive damages.
(3) “Primary claimant” means a claimant in an action for the death of a
person described under § 3–904(d) of this article.
(4) “Secondary claimant” means a claimant in an action for the death of a
person described under § 3–904(e) of this article.
(b) (1) In any action for damages for personal injury in which the cause of
action arises on or after July 1, 1986, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed
$350,000.
(2) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (3)(ii) of this subsection, in any
action for damages for personal injury or wrongful death in which the cause of action arises
on or after October 1, 1994, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed $500,000.
(ii) The limitation on noneconomic damages provided under
subparagraph (i) of this paragraph shall increase by $15,000 on October 1 of each year
beginning on October 1, 1995. The increased amount shall apply to causes of action arising
between October 1 of that year and September 30 of the following year, inclusive.
(3) (i) The limitation established under paragraph (2) of this subsection
shall apply in a personal injury action to each direct victim of tortious conduct and all
persons who claim injury by or through that victim.
(ii) In a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, an award for noneconomic damages may not exceed 150% of the
limitation established under paragraph (2) of this subsection, regardless of the number of
claimants or beneficiaries who share in the award.
(c) An award by the health claims arbitration panel in accordance with §
3–2A–05 of this article for damages in which the cause of action arose before January 1,
2005, shall be considered an award for purposes of this section.
(d) (1) In a jury trial, the jury may not be informed of the limitation
established under subsection (b) of this section.
(2) (i) If the jury awards an amount for noneconomic damages that
exceeds the limitation established under subsection (b) of this section, the court shall
reduce the amount to conform to the limitation.
(ii) In a wrongful death action in which there are two or more
claimants or beneficiaries, if the jury awards an amount for noneconomic damages that
exceeds the limitation established under subsection (b)(3)(ii) of this section, the court shall:

SENATE BILL 584 3
1. If the amount of noneconomic damages for the primary
claimants equals or exceeds the limitation under subsection (b)(3)(ii) of this section:
A. Reduce each individual award of a primary claimant
proportionately to the total award of all of the primary claimants so that the total award to
all claimants or beneficiaries conforms to the limitation; and
B. Reduce each award, if any, to a secondary claimant to zero
dollars; or
2. If the amount of noneconomic damages for the primary
claimants does not exceed the limitation under subsection (b)(3)(ii) of this section or if there
is no award to a primary claimant:
A. Enter an award to the primary claimant, if any, as
directed by the verdict; and
B. Reduce each individual award of a secondary claimant
proportionately to the total award of all of the secondary claimants so that the total award
to all claimants or beneficiaries conforms to the limitation.
(e) The provisions of this section do not apply to a verdict under Title 3, Subtitle
2A of this article for damages in which the cause of action arises on or after January 1,
2005.]
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall be construed to
apply only prospectively and may not be applied or interpreted to have any effect on or
application to any cause of action arising before the effective date of this Act.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.